Missouri, session 2026, HB2608.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.646, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 115.646, to read as follows:
115.646. No contribution or expenditure of public funds shall be made directly by any
officer, employee,or agent of any political subdivision, [including school districts and charter
schools] special district, or charter school to advocate, support, or oppose the passage or
defeat of any ballot measure or the nomination or election of any candidate for public office,
or to direct any public funds to, or pay any debts or obligations of, any committee supporting
or opposing such ballot measures or candidates. This section shall not be construed to
prohibit any public official of a political subdivision, including school districts and charter
schools, from making public appearances or from issuing press releases concerning any such
ballot measure. Any purposeful violation of this section shall be punished as a class four
election offense.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.